Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.340.020

Eligibility—Participation.

School districts eligible for funding as a small high school district pursuant to the state operating appropriations act shall be eligible to participate in a cooperative project: PROVIDED, That the superintendent of public instruction may adopt rules permitting second-class school districts that are not eligible for funding as a small high school district in the state operating appropriations act to participate in a cooperative project.

Two or more school districts may participate in a cooperative project pursuant to RCW 28A.340.020 through 28A.340.070.

[ 1990 c 33 s 367; 1988 c 268 s 3. Formerly RCW 28A.100.082.]

NOTES:

Findings—Severability—1988 c 268: See notes following RCW 28A.340.010.